Massachusetts, session 194th, S378.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 89 of said chapter 71, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “application”, in line 294, the following words:-
including, but not limited to the financial impact of establishing or expanding the charter school
on the students and schools of the sending district or districts
SECTION 2. Section 89 of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “criteria”, in line 296, the following text:- No charter application shall be
approved before a report has been presented to the board by the department on the financial
impact to the sending district or districts.
SECTION 3. Subsection (gg) of said section 89 of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by adding the following 2 sentences:- Annually, not later than January 10, the
of 2

department shall make a request to the general court for the full funding of this reimbursement
and the reimbursement calculated under subsection (ff). If the general court rejects the request to
fund the reimbursement, the board shall not approve any application for a new charter school or
a charter school expansion in the following school year.
of 2